Utah statutes.
76-6-506.5 (Superseded 11/01/10).   Financial transaction card offenses -- Classification -- Multiple violations.

(1)  Any person found guilty of unlawful conduct described in Section 76-6-506.2 or 76-6-506.6 is guilty of:

(a)  a class B misdemeanor when the value of the property, money, or thing obtained or sought to be obtained is less than $300;

(b)  a class A misdemeanor when the value of the property, money, or thing obtained or sought to be obtained is or exceeds $300 but is less than $1,000;

(c)  a third degree felony when the value of the property, money, or thing obtained or attempted to be obtained is or exceeds $1,000 but is less than $5,000; and

(d)  a second degree felony when the value of the property, money, or thing obtained or attempted to be obtained is or exceeds $5,000.

(2)  Multiple violations of Subsection 76-6-506.2(1), Section 76-6-506.6, and this section may be aggregated into a single offense, and the degree of the offense is determined by the total value of all property, money, or things obtained or attempted to be obtained through the multiple violations.

(3)  The court shall make appropriate findings in any prosecution under this section that the card holder did not commit the crime.

